Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-529.01
Dikes; erection and maintenance; eminent domain; procedure.

In connection with the power to establish and alter the channel of watercourses and the power to erect and maintain dikes against flood waters and surface waters, cities of the second class and villages shall be empowered to exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire easements and rights-of-way over real estate situated either within or not more than two miles outside the corporate limits of such city or village, for the purpose of constructing either a ditch or a dike to prevent flooding of such city or village. The procedure for taking and condemning real estate for such purpose shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724. In connection with such condemnation proceedings, the city or village shall be liable not only for the land actually taken but for consequential damages to other lands damaged by the construction of such improvement and shall be authorized to pay such damages out of any available funds on hand or by the issuance of bonds as provided by law.

Laws 1947, c. 35, § 1(2), p. 146;

Laws 1949, c. 23, § 1, p. 95;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 56, p. 473;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 16, p. 939;

Laws 1965, c. 66, § 1, p. 286;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 149.

For additional flood control powers and duties of cities of the second class and villages, see section 23-320.07.

For funding provisions, see section 17-529.08.

Exercise of powers of eminent domain and taxation were authorized for flood control project. Gruntorad v. Hughes Bros. Inc., 161 Neb. 358, 73 N.W.2d 700 (1955).